Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-377
Cost of patient care; guardian; duties; liability.

In all cases in which a guardian has been named for any person liable for payments under sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379, the guardian shall represent such person in all matters arising under sections 83-227.01, 83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379 and shall be liable in the same manner as he or she would be on any other matters arising from the guardianship.

Laws 1969, c. 812, § 15, p. 3055;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 38.
July 18, 2026